src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
!! Propernouns
!  -----
!! This is the file for Sakirabiá proper nouns

LEXICON Propernouns
Arɨkwajõ+N:Arɨkwajõ ProperNounCases "(name)" ;
Kõtkõra+N:Kõtkõra ProperNounCases "Cicada" ;
